Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.055

Supplemental share purchase subscription rights—Supplemental eligible account holder—Conditions.

In plans involving an eligibility record date that is more than fifteen months prior to the date of the latest amendment to the application for conversion filed prior to the director approval, a supplemental eligibility record date shall be determined whereby each supplemental eligible account holder of the converting savings bank shall receive, without payment, nontransferable subscription rights to purchase supplemental shares in an amount equal to the greatest of two hundred shares, one-tenth of one percent of the total offering of shares, or fifteen times the product (rounded down to the next whole number) obtained by multiplying the total number of shares of capital stock to be issued by a fraction of which the numerator is the amount of the qualifying deposit of the supplemental eligible account holder and the denominator is the total amount of the qualifying deposits of all supplemental eligible account holders in the converting savings bank on the supplemental eligibility record date.

(1) Subscription rights received pursuant to this section shall be subordinated to all rights received by eligible account holders to purchase shares pursuant to RCW 32.32.045 and 32.32.050.

(2) Any nontransferable subscription rights to purchase shares received by an eligible account holder in accordance with RCW 32.32.045 shall be applied in partial satisfaction of the subscription rights to be distributed pursuant to this section.

(3) In the event of an oversubscription for supplemental shares pursuant to this section, shares shall be allocated among the subscribing supplemental eligible account holders as follows:

(a) Shares shall be allocated among subscribing supplemental eligible account holders so as to permit each such supplemental account holder, to the extent possible, to purchase a number of shares sufficient to make the supplemental account holder's total allocation (including the number of shares, if any, allocated in accordance with RCW 32.32.045) equal to one hundred shares.

(b) Any shares not allocated in accordance with subsection (3)(a) of this section shall be allocated among the subscribing supplemental eligible account holders on such equitable basis, related to the amounts of their respective qualifying deposits, as may be provided in the plan of conversion.

[ 1994 c 92 s 355; 1981 c 85 s 10.]